North Carolina, session 2025, SB959.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Title of Act. – This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Student
Loan Forgiveness and Talent Retention Study Act."
SECTION 2. Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this act:
(1) Eligible borrower. – An individual who obtained a postsecondary credential
from a public institution of higher education.
(2) Eligible student loan debt. – Federal student loans incurred by an eligible
borrower to attend a public institution of higher education. This term shall not
include any of the following:
a. Private loans provided to attend a public institution of higher
education.
b. Federal loans issued to the parents of an eligible borrower.
c. Loans incurred to attend a private institution of higher education or an
institution of higher education located outside this State.
(3) Program. – The Student Loan Forgiveness and Talent Retention Program
described in Section 3 of this act.
(4) Public institution of higher education. – A constituent institution of The
University of North Carolina or a community college located in this State.
SECTION 3.(a) Study. – The State Education Assistance Authority, in consultation
with the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, the State Board of Community
*S959-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Colleges, the Department of Commerce, and any other relevant stakeholders in the area of
workforce and economic development, shall study the feasibility and advisability of establishing
a Student Loan Forgiveness and Talent Retention Program for eligible student loan debt. The
study shall evaluate possible Program structures in North Carolina and costs necessary to
encourage eligible borrowers to remain in North Carolina for a sustained period of time following
graduation, including at least the following:
(1) Administrative considerations and options for implementation.
(2) The estimated fiscal impact of the Program described in this act.
(3) Recommended eligibility requirements for the Program, including residency
and workforce participation requirements.
(4) Options for benefits structures, including loan forgiveness amounts and
repayment mechanisms.
(5) Interaction with federal programs, including the Public Service Loan
Forgiveness Program and any other federal student loan repayment programs
or benefits.
(6) Workforce and economic development impacts of the Program, including
projected effects on talent retention within the State.
(7) Comparable programs in other states, including best practices and lessons
learned from those programs.
SECTION 3.(b) Report. – No later than October 1, 2027, the State Education
Assistance Authority shall report the results of the study conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, including a recommendation
for whether the General Assembly should establish a Student Loan Forgiveness and Talent
Retention Program as described in this act and, if so, a proposed program structure and estimate
of costs.
SECTION 4. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($150,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the State
Education Assistance Authority to conduct the study and provide the report described in this act.
These funds shall not revert at the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year but shall remain available
until October 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 959-First Edition